Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 336, O.S.L.
2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 365), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 365. A. Any current or former officer, employee, or
contractor of a state agency or political subdivision who obtains or
obtained nonpublic information because of his or her government
employment, government office, or contract with a state agency or
political subdivision, and who corruptly, as defined by Section 94
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes:

1. Uses such information for personal gain or benefit;
2. Acquires or divests a pecuniary interest in any property,
transaction, or enterprise which may be affected by such
information;
3. Speculates or wagers on the basis of such information;
4. Uses such information in a way that would affect any
personal pecuniary interest, including an interest held by an
immediate family member, or business entity with which the immediate
family member is associated;
5. Discloses such information to any person, group, entity, or
others not entitled to receive such information; or
6. Aids another to commit any act set forth in paragraphs 1
through 5 of this subsection,
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine
not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), by imprisonment in
the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not to
exceed five (5) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Any
person convicted of violating any provision of this section shall be
prohibited from holding any public office in this state and shall be
prohibited from entering into any state contract with a state agency
or political subdivision.
B. Violation of any provision of this section shall be grounds
for removal from office or termination from state government
employment.
C. For purposes of this section, the term "immediate family
member" means:
1. A spouse;
2. A spouse's parents;
3. A child by birth or adoption;
4. A stepchild;
5. A parent;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3419 Page 2

6. A grandparent;
7. A grandchild;
8. A sibling;
9. A spouse's siblings; or
10. A spouse of any immediate family member listed in this
subsection.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3419 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3419 Page 4